North Carolina, session 2025, HB112.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INCREASE MAXIMUM PERMISSIBLE SPEED LIMIT ON INTERSTATE
HIGHWAYS
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-141(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) (1) Whenever the Department of Transportation determines on the basis of an
engineering and traffic investigation that any speed allowed by subsection (b)
is greater than is reasonable and safe under the conditions found to exist upon
any part of a highway outside the corporate limits of a municipality or upon
any part of a highway designated as part of the Interstate Highway System or
any part of a controlled-access highway (either inside or outside the corporate
limits of a municipality), the Department of Transportation shall determine
and declare a reasonable and safe speed limit.
(2) Whenever the Department of Transportation determines on the basis of an
engineering and traffic investigation that a higher maximum speed than those
set forth in subsection (b) is reasonable and safe under the conditions found to
exist upon any part of a highway designated as part of the Interstate Highway
System or any part of a controlled-access highway (either inside or outside the
corporate limits of a municipality) the Department of Transportation shall
determine and declare a reasonable and safe speed limit. A speed limit set
pursuant to this subsection may not exceed 70 75 miles per hour.
Speed limits set pursuant to this subsection are not effective until appropriate signs giving
notice thereof are erected upon the parts of the highway affected."

PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 20-141(j1) reads as rewritten:
"(j1) A person who drives a vehicle on a highway at a speed that is either is (i) more than
15 miles per hour more than the speed limit established by law for the highway where the offense
occurred or occurred, (ii) over 80 miles per hour where the maximum speed is up to 70 miles per
hour, or (iii) over 85 miles per hour where the maximum speed is 75 miles per hour is guilty of
a Class 3 misdemeanor."
*H112-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 20-16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-16. Authority of Division to suspend license.
(a) The Division shall have authority to suspend the license of any operator with or
without a preliminary hearing upon a showing by its records or other satisfactory evidence that
the licensee:
…
(10a) Has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle at a speed in excess of 80
miles per hour on a public highway where the maximum speed is 70 miles per
hour; or
(10b) Has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle at a speed in excess of 85
miles per hour on a public highway where the maximum speed is 75 miles per
hour; or
…
(c) The Division shall maintain a record of convictions of every person licensed or
required to be licensed under the provisions of this Article as an operator and shall enter therein
records of all convictions of such persons for any violation of the motor vehicle laws of this State
and shall assign to the record of such person, as of the date of commission of the offense, a
number of points for every such conviction in accordance with the following schedule of
convictions and points, except that points shall not be assessed for convictions resulting in
suspensions or revocations under other provisions of laws: Further, any points heretofore charged
for violation of the motor vehicle inspection laws shall not be considered by the Division of
Motor Vehicles as a basis for suspension or revocation of driver's license:
…
In the discretion of the Division, a period of probation not to exceed one year may be
substituted for suspension or for any unexpired period of suspension under subsections (a)(1)
through (a)(10a) (a)(10b) of this section. Any violation of probation during the probation period
shall result in a suspension for the unexpired remainder of the suspension period. Any
accumulation of three or more points under this subsection during a period of probation shall
constitute a violation of the condition of probation.
(d) Upon suspending the license of any person as authorized in this section, the Division
shall immediately notify the licensee in writing and upon his request shall afford him an
opportunity for a hearing, not to exceed 60 days after receipt of the request, unless a preliminary
hearing was held before his license was suspended. Upon such hearing the duly authorized agents
of the Division may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses
and the production of relevant books and papers and may require a reexamination of the licensee.
Upon such hearing the Division shall either rescind its order of suspension, or good cause
appearing therefor, may extend the suspension of such license. Provided further upon such
hearing, preliminary or otherwise, involving subsections (a)(1) through (a)(10a) (a)(10b) of this
section, the Division may for good cause appearing in its discretion substitute a period of
probation not to exceed one year for the suspension or for any unexpired period of suspension.
Probation shall mean any written agreement between the suspended driver and a duly authorized
representative of the Division and such period of probation shall not exceed one year, and any
violation of the probation agreement during the probation period shall result in a suspension for
the unexpired remainder of the suspension period. The authorized agents of the Division shall
have the same powers in connection with a preliminary hearing prior to suspension as this
subsection provided in connection with hearings held after suspension. These agents shall also
have the authority to take possession of a surrendered license on behalf of the Division if the
suspension is upheld and the licensee requests that the suspension begin immediately.
…
(e1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, if the Division suspends the
license of an operator pursuant to subdivisions (a)(9), (a)(10), or (a)(10a) (a)(10a), or (a)(10b) of
Page 2 House Bill 112-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
this section, upon the first suspension only, a district court judge may allow the licensee a limited
driving privilege or license for a period not to exceed 12 months, provided he has not been
convicted of any other motor vehicle moving violation within the previous 12 months. The
limited driving privilege shall be issued in the same manner and under the terms and conditions
prescribed in G.S. 20-16.1(b)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5).
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 20-16.1(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Article, the Division shall suspend for a
period of 30 days the license of any driver without preliminary hearing on receiving a record of
the driver's conviction of either (i) exceeding by more than 15 miles per hour the speed limit,
either within or outside the corporate limits of a municipality, if the person was also driving at a
speed in excess of 55 miles per hour at the time of the offense, or (ii) driving at a speed in excess
of 80 miles per hour where the maximum speed is up to 70 miles per hour at the time of the
offense.offense, or (iii) driving at a speed in excess of 85 or greater miles per hour where the
maximum speed is 75 miles per hour at the time of the offense."
SECTION 2.(d) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PART III. SAVINGS CLAUSE
SECTION 3. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE CLAUSE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 112-First Edition Page 3